Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
47C

INDEBTEDNESS
OF THE COUNTIES, EXCLUSIONS FROM

THE FUNDED
DEBT, AND CERTIFICATION THEREOF

Section

47C-1 Definitions

47C-2 Determination of funded debt

47C-3 Supplemental determination

47C-4 Exclusionary provisions

47C-5 Concurrence in summaries

47C-6 Public hearing; declaratory judgment

47C-7 Effect of summary

Note

Chapter heading
amended by L 1979, c 43, §4(1).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next